Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-1247
Bridges; joint purchase.

Any city of the metropolitan class exercising the power granted in section 14-1202 to jointly purchase by bargain and sale any existing bridge may do so either when the electors have authorized such joint purchase or have authorized any independent purchase of such bridge. The city council may enter into a joint contract with the other political unit as to all the conditions of purchase and the conditions of subsequent reconditioning, operation, toll charges, repair, maintenance, renewal, replacement, enlargement, and extension of such bridge. Title to the bridge shall vest in the political units cooperating as tenants in common and operation shall be by the joint bridge commission provided for in section 14-1244 and subject to the conditions provided with reference to such joint bridge commission.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 23, p. 630;

C.S.1929, § 14-1223;

R.S.1943, § 14-1247;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 280.
July 21, 2022